Wisconsin, session 2025, AB802.
do enact as follows:AB802,11Section 1. Nonstatutory provisions.AB802,2,62(1) Health care claims information dashboard. From the appropriation 3under s. 20.435 (1) (fn), the department of health services shall award a onetime 4grant of $600,000 in fiscal year 2026-27 to the data organization under contract 5under s. 153.05 (2r) to establish an online dashboard of health care claims 6information and to onboard new payer data.AB802,2,117(2) Reconciliation. (a) If 2025 Senate Bill .... (LRB-3683/1), or any other 82025 bill whose content is identical to the content of 2025 Senate Bill .... (LRB-93683/1), is enacted into law, then this act takes effect on the effective date of the 10first of those bills that is enacted into law or on the effective date of this paragraph, 11whichever is later.AB802,2,1212(b) If par. (a) does not apply, then this act is void.AB802,213Section 2. Fiscal changes.AB802,2,1714(1) Health care claims information dashboard. In the schedule under s. 1520.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of health services under s. 1620.435 (1) (fn), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $600,000 to 17award the grant under Section 1 (1) of this act.AB802,3,218(2) Data organization operational costs. In the schedule under s. 20.005 19(3) for the appropriation to the department of health services under s. 20.435 (1) 20(fn), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $1,380,000 and the 21dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $1,560,000 to support 1increased operational costs for the data organization under contract under s. 153.05 2(2r).AB802,3,33